dicts/fur_IT/fur-IT.aff
SFX N N 75
SFX N   ignî   en   ignî
SFX N   ignî   egnis   ignî
SFX N   î   ìn   î
SFX N   î   îs   î
SFX N   ignî   egnin   ignî
SFX N   î   ivi   î
SFX N   î   ivis   î
SFX N   î   ive   î
SFX N   î   ivin   î
SFX N   î   ii   î
SFX N   î   iris   î
SFX N   î   ì   î
SFX N   î   irin   î
SFX N   î   arai   î
SFX N   î   arâs   î
SFX N   î   arà   î
SFX N   î   arìn   î
SFX N   î   arês   î
SFX N   î   aran   î
SFX N   ignî   egni   ignî
SFX N   î   edi   î
SFX N   ignî   egnis   ignî
SFX N   î   edis   î
SFX N   î   edin   î
SFX N   ignî   egnin   ignî
SFX N   î   ìs   î
SFX N   î   issis   î
SFX N   î   issin   î
SFX N   î   arès   î
SFX N   î   aressis   î
SFX N   î   aressin   î
SFX N   î   ût   î
SFX N   î   ûts   î
SFX N   î   ude   î
SFX N   î   udis   î
SFX N   î   int   î
SFX N   î   ît   î
SFX N   ignî   egnio   ignî
SFX N   ignî   egnistu   ignî
SFX N   ignî   egnial   ignî
SFX N   ignî   egnie   ignî
SFX N   î   ìno   î
SFX N   î   îso   î
SFX N   ignî   egnino   ignî
SFX N   î   ivio   î
SFX N   î   ivistu   î
SFX N   î   ivial   î
SFX N   î   ivie   î
SFX N   î   ivino   î
SFX N   î   iviso   î
SFX N   î   irio   î
SFX N   î   iristu   î
SFX N   î   irial   î
SFX N   î   irie   î
SFX N   î   irino   î
SFX N   î   iriso   î
SFX N   î   araio   î
SFX N   î   arâstu   î
SFX N   î   araial   î
SFX N   î   araie   î
SFX N   î   arìno   î
SFX N   î   arêso   î
SFX N   î   arano   î
SFX N   î   issio   î
SFX N   î   issistu   î
SFX N   î   issial   î
SFX N   î   issie   î
SFX N   î   issino   î
SFX N   î   issiso   î
SFX N   î   aressio   î
SFX N   î   aressistu   î
SFX N   î   aressial   î
SFX N   î   aressie   î
SFX N   î   aressino   î
SFX N   î   aressiso   î
